

Live Chat, Customer Service & Workforce Management Software | CafeX




























Loading...










 
 
 
 
 
 
















Now supports mobile customers,
chatbots and much more! 


Read the Release








Download our latest whitepaper
The Value of Real-Time Collaboration and Analytics to Drive Proactive Customer Service


Download Whitepaper








Using Group Workspaces to Achieve Business Outcomes
Read the full report by Dr. Brent Kelly
Download Whitepaper








 Just Chime In 
Try our FREE video conferencing service now! There’s nothing to download or install. Just click and share the link. Meeting online couldn’t be easier!

Watch Video
Go to justchimein.com











Redefining digital customer experiences
Engage customers proactively with in-browser chat, co-browsing and personalized content campaigns without leaving Dynamics 365!
Learn More







CaféX Supervisor Assist Achieves Avaya Compliance and DevConnect Partner Status

Read More







Previous
Next







Our software transforms business collaboration and customer
engagement in mobile and web applications.
 


We believe collaboration should be easy, elegant and one click away.


Try our free video conferencing app powered by Chime.
Meet instantly – install nothing.
Just Chime In


Learn more about our award-winning products.




Live Assist for Dynamics 365
Create omnichannel customer experiences on Microsoft Dynamics 365 with personalized in-app support via chat, co-browse, document share and more.
More Info


Chime
Create virtual spaces and online meetings that reach all parties everywhere with one-click collaboration to drive business outcomes.
More Info


Supervisor Assist
Boost your call center’s performance by coaching agents while they are on the phone. From any web browser you can listen, monitor their screens and interact live for proactive intervention.
more info


Live Assist®
Give your customers live access to experts right from your website and apps with screen sharing, video chat, co-browse and more.
more info





Connect With CaféX
Meet our experts, set up a demo, try our software and learn more.
Request Demo


Companies already on the journey with CaféX





































































































WebRTC Resources for Live Digital Engagement, CafeX




























Loading...










 
 
 
 
 
 











Resources
Browse our resources







Videos
Watch how CaféX ‘Makes Together Happen’ for customers, experts and employees within mobile and web applications across financial services, insurance and other industries. 
SEE VIDEOS


On-Demand Webinars
From over the shoulder realtime agent coaching to transforming your omnichannel customer experience. See the latest CaféX webinars on-demand here.
See Webinars


Case Studies
Read about how CaféX customers across vertical industries are increasing customer loyalty, reducing operating costs and utilizing employees more effectively thanks to real-time engagement solutions.
SEE CASE STUDIES


Whitepapers
Download research from top industry analysts to understand more about pervasive collaboration, the business case for web real-time technologies and other topics.
See Whitepapers


Infographics
Check out these latest visualizations showing the impact that digital disruption is having on today’s businesses and our 2016 highlights from A to Z.
See Infographics


Brochures & Datasheets
Find out more about who we are, the real-time collaboration solutions we build and the story behind our brand.
SEE DATASHEETS


















Login - Live Assist for Dynamics 365 Portal




























Welcome to the Live Assist for Dynamics 365 Portal 






                E-mail*







                Password*






Login






                    Remember Me
                    


    




    



                




Forgot Password?


  Login with Google
















CafeX Blog  - Page 1






























Loading...










 
 
 
 
 
 











Our Blog
Read our latest blog posts







  Be the Host with the Most: 4 Capabilities of Team Collaboration Software that Make it Easy for Guests



        By Sandra Thomson
        
        July 18, 2017
    
According to the 2016 US State of Enterprise Work Report, the amount of time office workers spend doing their primary job duties decreased in 2016, from 46% to 39%. So what’s going on? Shouldn’t we all be more productive than ever before with all our team collaboration software tools? Maybe that’s the problem - we have too many...




  New in Live Assist™ for Microsoft Dynamics 365: Chatbots, Mobile Support and More!



        By John Mathew
        
        July 13, 2017
    
This week was exciting for CaféX, as we announced Cosmos, the latest release of Live Assist for Microsoft Dynamics 365, the only omnichannel solution for Dynamics 365 co-engineered with and endorsed by Microsoft. Live Assist integrates content, campaigns, live chat, chatbot and co-browsing capabilities in Unified Service Desk and Dynamics web clients to make agents more productive while improving mobile and web customer engagement.




  Booking a Summer Holiday? Watch How Omnichannel Enhances the Online Experience



        By Gethin Liddell
        
        July 6, 2017
    
Summer is one of my favourite seasons, especially with the spectacular weather we have been having lately in the UK. As many of us make holiday plans, I thought it appropriate to record a video showing how CaféX Live Assist™ for Microsoft Dynamics 365 enhances the experience of booking a hotel room online, both for the guest and the service agent. 




  Netflix Customer Service



        By Gethin Liddell
        
        June 30, 2017
    
I recently had to contact Netflix® regarding my subscription. I was unable to login to my account from a new device and wanted to continue my latest binge. In this post I will relay my customer service experience and, as good as it was, how it could have been improved.




  Adding Live Chat to Your Website? OK, but Ask These 3 Questions First.



        By Gethin Liddell
        
        May 15, 2017
    
Many of my conversations with customers and partners start by them saying something like: “We want to enable chat on our website.”
My responses to this are always: 1) “OK. Why?” 2) “What problem(s) are you trying to solve or opportunity are you trying to capture?” 3) “And will live web chat alone provide the solution(s)?”




  5 Reasons for a New Video Conferencing Tool



        By Kevin Glass
        
        April 27, 2017
    
It seems to us here at CafeX that there has been a sudden rise in the number of video conferencing tools being released. It’s a good sign in most ways, as it validates the industry’s recognition that video communications still has room to grow and develop. It also means that customers have a choice, which is always good for innovation.




  Microsoft + CaféX: Turbocharging Customer Engagement with Immersiveness and Intelligence



        By  Sajeel Hussain
        
        March 14, 2017
    
As the Bob Dylan song “The Times They Are A-Changing” hums in the background, I can’t help but think how true that statement rings for the contact center & CRM domain. It was last October when Jujhar Singh, Corporate VP of Microsoft’s R&D organization for Dynamics CRM, announced the strategic partnership between Microsoft and CaféX to change how businesses engage customers online.




  Meet us at Enterprise Connect 2017



        By  Neill Ellis
        
        March 6, 2017
    
CaféX is redefining contact center operations and customer engagement!




  Three Digital Customer Engagement Must-Haves for Contact Centers to Level-Up in 2017



        By Caryne Say
        
        Jan. 30, 2017
    
Digital technology is fast transforming the contact center industry.  In 2017, predictions spanning from artificial intelligence to cloud have been made concerning technologies that will dominate customer experience success. For businesses looking to level up their game, here are three fundamental customer engagement strategies that must not be missed.




  Chime - A Year On, Embracing Business Driven Collaboration



        By Kevin Glass
        
        Jan. 25, 2017
    
It’s nearly a year since we showed Chime at Enterprise Connect 2016 and won best in show for the second time. As development has progressed we’ve learnt a lot and faced down (and beaten) some huge technical challenges. Of course, at the same time we’ve been out on the road showing customers what it can do and getting those installs running. 



1
2
3
4


                    Next
                    



















Videos for Collaboration, Coaching & Co-Browse in Apps




























Loading...










 
 
 
 
 
 











Videos








 CaféX Chime for frictionless collaboration within every browser
Watch how your business can provide face-to-face teaming to all users at a fraction of the cost of today’s video conferencing systems. Chime connects to leading room and desktop systems and fulfills WebRTC’s open promises by reaching every user securely on every browser with no software to install.



 Watch video


















 Watch video











 CaféX Supervisor Assist for remote agent coaching from any browser during customer calls
Watch how CafeX helps contact centers improve performance by enabling supervisors to listen to, observe and interact with agents in real-time during customer calls directly from any Web browser.








CaféX Live Assist helps banks delight customers online
Watch how banks can provide customers with live video engagement within mobile applications and websites to improve satisfaction. Bank representatives can co-browse, annotate and share documents with customers to help answer questions more quickly.



 Watch video


















 Watch video











CaféX Live Assist helps insurers respond faster to clients
Watch this video to learn how insurance companies can use CafeX Live Assist to help solve customer problems faster. Company experts can connect instantly with customers through co-browsing, video chat and more within mobile and web applications.








 CaféX Live Assist enables face-to-face healthcare from virtually anywhere
Watch this video to see how clinicians can interact face-to-face with patients who are at home. With CafeX Live Assist, doctors can share documents with patients, annotate over their app screens or web pages, and help patients fill out forms.



 Watch video


















 Watch video











JurisLink and CaféX help legal services save time and money
JurisLink uses CafeX video conferencing and WebRTC technology to make it simple for attorneys to interact remotely with inmates in correctional facilities, saving up to ten billable hours per visit.








 Digital disruption is here – is your business ready?
40% of Fortune 500 companies will be dead in 10 years, largely due to the threat of digital disruption. Mobile customer experience is becoming the key brand differentiator. Can your business adapt? Disrupt or be disrupted.



 Watch video


















 Watch video











 CaféX omnichannel engagement optimized for mobile and web
Watch how a customer browsing a company's website or mobile app can escalate from a web chat with one agent to in-app video with a second agent, who can see the chat session with the first agent, co-browse with the customer, push files, and draw on screen. The customer's context is preserved across channels and agents, increasing loyalty and net promoter score.








 CaféX is about making together happen
What happens when people get together? Understanding, potential, opportunities happen. Together is a big idea and we at CafeX are passionate about it, because when 'Together' gets to work the possibilities are endless. We create elegant pervasive experiences that are as natural as being face to face, so that people can connect, bond, express themselves, forge relationships and sustain them. We are the makers, the facilitators, the catalysers of ‘Together’.



 Watch video


















 Watch video











 CaféX wins Best of Enterprise 2016 award
CafeX wins the best of show award for the second time in three years at the collaboration industry's premier event. Chime makes collaboration pervasive throughout the enterprise by removing barriers such as cost, interoperability and ease of use.






















On-Demand-Webinar-CCWOnline-TELUS88







































item 
item 
item 
item 
item 
item 







PRODUCTS
RESOURCES
SUPPORT
ABOUT
CONTACT
BLOG














PRODUCTS
RESOURCES
SUPPORT
ABOUT
CONTACT
BLOG





















On-Demand Webinar
Boost Agent Performance with Remote Live Coaching
                    Featuring Mike Ringman, CIO, TELUS International
                

















Guest speaker: Mike Ringman, CIO TELUS International
In this 30 minute session, CafeX and Michael Ringman, CIO of TELUS International discuss innovative strategies to improve call center performance. Viewers will learn:


New ways to address the training demands of today’s distributed and transient workforce;
How to make new hires more productive more quickly;
The importance of omni-channel coaching solutons that support real-time collaboration with trainees. 

Viewers will also receive a live demo of CaféX Supervisor Assist, a remote live coaching solution for today’s omnichannel and mobile workplace.










Sign up to view the on-demand webinar now.

































item 
item 
item 
item 
item 
item 







PRODUCTS
DEVELOPERS
SUPPORT
ABOUT
CONTACT
CAREERS
PRESS
BLOG
NEWSLETTER







































WebRTC Apps for Developers, Mobile and Web Engagement, CafeX




























Loading...










 
 
 
 
 
 











Developers








 Video powered apps
CaféX Client SDK allows users to develop JavaScript, iOS and Android applications that are embedded with voice and video calling to enterprise devices or other apps. Web plugins are avoided and sample apps are included as well.














 In-app collaboration
CaféX Live Assist SDK enables developers to embed co-browse, remote app control, annotation, form fill and document sharing capabilities within customer-facing Web, iOS and Android apps. A sample web interface for the expert side is provided along with a simple API for voice & video chat.








Intelligent interactions
CaféX Palettes SDK enables an application to submit contextual data in conjunction with inbound customer calls to drive intelligent routing and IVR bypass. Customer wait times, queue length, and IVR data can also be extracted dynamically from the contact center and rendered visually within mobile and web apps.
Request Demo




















Contextual Real-Time Communications Leader, About Us, CafeX




























Loading...










 
 
 
 
 
 











Our mission
CaféX is about making together happen. We help companies accelerate business results by engaging customers, partners and employees in new and delightful ways.









What we do

CaféX creates software that makes it amazingly simple for people to collaborate in ways that work best for them.
We believe that digital engagement should be tailored to each person's wants and needs. Customers and partners should be able to choose when, how, and where to interact with a company's services. Employees should be able to collaborate effortlessly through video, chat, and screen sharing. And the transition from an app to a live person should be as simple as tapping a button. These personalized, intelligent connections strengthen business relationships and deliver measurable results.

more info





 In the news




CRM Partners Signs Partnership Agreement with CafeX For Live Customer Engagement Within Microsoft Dynamics 365


CaféX Cosmos release of Live Assist for Dynamics 365 streamlines bot, AI vision


CafeX Unveils Cosmos Version of Live Assist for Dynamics 365


CafeX upgrades omnichannel customer service solution for Dynamics 365


CafeX Unveils New Version of Omnichannel Solution for Dynamics 365 at Microsoft Inspire


Provance and CafeX Join Forces and Sign Partnership Agreement


How Dumb is it for Your Supervisors to Support Agents?


CafeX Launches Partner Program for Live Assist™ for Microsoft Dynamics 365


CaféX, Live Assist – Campaign and Engagement Theory


Team Collaboration Shines at EC17


Let’s Do Video’s 2017 Enterprise Connect Wrap-Up


5 Game Changers Emerge at Enterprise Connect


CafeX Unveils Chime Spaces for Outcome-Driven Collaboration at Enterprise Connect 2017


Voxbone Announces Strategic Partnership with CafeX to Extend Reach of Chime™ Product


CafeX Partners with Aceyus to Drive Contact Center Performance


CRN Exclusive: CafeX To Increase Channel Delivery Through High-Margin Contact Center Software


Live Assist for Dynamics 365 – First Look


CafeX integration for omni-channel service beefs up Microsoft Dynamics 365


CafeX Real-time Enables Customer Engagement for Microsoft Dynamics 365 With Live Assist


CafeX Announces Availability of Omni


CaféX launches Live Assist for Microsoft Dynamics 365


CafeX Launches Live Assist for Microsoft Dynamics 365


Amazon Chime – Did AWS Buy the Wrong Company?


Four Conferences and a Funeral


CaféX Chimes In


CafeX Analyst Event - "an Innovator, not a Disruptor"


CafeX Closes $18M Series C Funding Led by Rakuten, parent of Rakuten Communications


What ‘Chime’ is it? Amazon sued over name of its new online conferencing technology


A Cacophony of Chimes


CafeX Supervisor Assist Now Rated "Avaya Compliant"


Aceyus Intelligence Forms Strategic Partnership with CafeX


CafeX and Aceyus Team Up to Accelerate Contact Center Innovation


Meet the First Class of the Box Platform Incubator Program


Japan’s Rakuten leads $18M round into communications startup CafeX


CafeX Acquires Vayyoo to Expand Enterprise Collaboration Platform


CafeX and ITOCHU Corporation Announce Strategic Partnership in APAC


TeleTech Technology Offers Turnkey Complimentary Trial of CaféX's Real-Time Agent Coaching Solution



Next
Previous



 Our awards








2016 Real Time Web Solutions Excellence Award

CaféX Supervisor Assist wins TMC’s 2016 Real Time Web Solutions Excellence Award for transforming how contact center operators monitor, coach and train agents.








CaféX Named as Gartner Cool Vendor

Gartner Research in its annual Cool Vendors in UC report highlights CaféX's use of WebRTC together with advances in mobile, video and contextual communication technologies to








Demo Award Winner at 2016 WebRTC Event

CaféX Live Assist received the Best All-Around Award during the demo competition at the 2016 Real Time Web Solutions Conference.








Mobile & Web Customer Engagement Award

Frost & Sullivan announces CaféX as the winner of the 2014 North American Mobile and Web Customer Engagement Solutions New Product Innovation Award.








Innovation Award Winner at Paris WebRTC Event

CafeX Live Assist® is the winner of the Innovation award at the 2015 WebRTC Conference and Expo in Paris during a live demonstration competition that featured a number of top








Best of Enterprise Connect 2016 Winner

CaféX Chime wins the best of show award for enabling pervasive collaboration across browser and mobile endpoints in conjunction with cloud-based video conferencing and














Join Our Team

We seek talented individuals to help us transform the way people interact. Our team specializes in finding simple solutions to complex problems. We are passionate about helping companies create exciting, innovative experiences for their customers and employees.  If you are looking for a dynamic, fast-paced environment that focuses on results while having fun, check out our Careers page.

more info




Meet our Team






Rami Musallam
Co-Founder, President & CEO
more info








Rami Musallam
Co-Founder, President & CEO
Rami Musallam is president and chief executive officer of CaféX Communications. He co-founded CaféX in 2013 and has served as CEO for the past 17 years, beginning with Thrupoint, Inc. Prior to joining Thrupoint in 1996, Rami was vice president of Global Intranet Communications for Morgan Stanley.
At CaféX, Rami and the company's leaders are focused on creating innovative software that makes it easier for companies to transform digital engagement. Prior to CaféX, Rami drove Thrupoint's evolution into a global, strategic IT consulting firm and later a leader in customer experience management solutions. Rami serves as a Corporate Advisory Board member for Inwood House, a leader and innovator in teen pregnancy prevention, youth development, and family support.












Daniel Solito
SVP & Chief Operating Officer
more info








Daniel Solito
SVP & Chief Operating Officer
Daniel Solito is senior vice president and chief operating officer at CaféX Communications. He brings a global perspective and a broad business operations background to the team. Prior to joining CaféX, Solito served in a variety of global leadership roles with Cisco Systems, UB Networks, Avaya and General Electric in both finance and operations capacities.
Solito received his MBA from Rockhurst University, a bachelor's degree in business administration from San Jose State University and is a graduate of GE's Financial Management Program.












Thomas O'Flaherty
Chief Financial Officer
more info








Thomas O'Flaherty
Chief Financial Officer
Thomas O'Flaherty serves as chief financial officer and chief administrative officer for CaféX Communications. Prior to his transition to CaféX in 2013, he served as CFO with Thrupoint for 14 years. O'Flaherty had previously completed a 15-year career with the network-building and management company formerly known as Timeplex Group, where he served, among other roles, as Corporate Controller and Director of Financial Planning and Analysis.












Kris Hopkins
Chief Product and Strategy Officer
more info








Kris Hopkins
Chief Product and Strategy Officer
Kris Hopkins serves as the chief product and strategy officer at CaféX. He is responsible for implementing the company's product vision and delivering leading edge customer engagement, video collaboration and enterprise communications solutions to the marketplace.
Previously a VP of strategic product management at Acme Packet, Inc. (Bedford, MA), Kris successfully sold the software business of Newfound Communications to Acme Packet (Nasdaq: APKT) and spun out the hosting business into Surgent Networks, LLC. Kris remains a board member of Surgent Networks.
As CEO of Newfound Communications, Kris was responsible for the overall vision, leadership and direction of the company. An experienced technical leader, Kris is the driving force behind Newfound's technology and software. Prior to founding Newfound, Kris was a manager of business development for service providers at Lucent Technologies.
Kris is a graduate from Cornell University where he was the recipient of the Dorman Family Award for Entrepreneurship and Personal Enterprise Excellence.












Sajeel Hussain
Chief Marketing Officer & EVP Strategic Partnerships
more info








Sajeel Hussain
Chief Marketing Officer & EVP Strategic Partnerships
Sajeel Hussain is chief marketing officer as well as executive vice president of marketing and strategic partnerships at CaféX. He brings deep market expertise, domain knowledge and experience in developing & executing go-to-market strategies.
Prior to joining CaféX and Thrupoint, Hussain served in a variety of global leadership roles within Nortel and Avaya spanning business development and marketing to product management. Hussain has Masters degrees in engineering and computer science from Purdue University and UT Dallas respectively. He also has an MBA from UT Austin. Hussain completed his undergraduate degree at the Indian Institute of Technology, Madras.












Nick Adams
EVP Worldwide Sales & Field Operations
more info








Nick Adams
EVP Worldwide Sales & Field Operations
Nick Adams is executive vice president of worldwide sales for CaféX. He has a proven track record in achieving high growth with emerging collaboration technologies as well as building successful key relationships with large enterprises. Prior to joining CaféX, Nick held several prominent field positions with Avaya, including strategic accounts & uc security sales and global sales operations.












Kevin Glass
Chief Innovation Officer
more info








Kevin Glass
Chief Innovation Officer
Kevin is chief innovation officer at CaféX Communications. Over the past 20 years Kevin has been developing and architecting software across various domains including telecommunications, defense systems, finance and CRM. During this time he's been responsible for building cutting edge data mining applications, interworking international carrier grade telecommunications systems and developing high reliability battlefield communications infrastructures.
Kevin has worked for industry giants including Lucent Technologies, Avaya and BAE Systems, where he rapidly gained a high profile for producing innovative solutions that reduced time to market. Known for improving the development culture of companies, Kevin has worked at all levels including systems development, architecture, project management and business development. He was also the founding developer at EdgeIPK, a CRM focused company eventually acquired by Temenos.
Kevin has two amazing children that keep him fit and healthy. He is also an avid indie game developer in his spare time and is responsible for a cross platform retro mobile game with over a million downloads to date.












Shailesh Kaul
SVP Business Solutions Group
more info








Shailesh Kaul
SVP Business Solutions Group
Shailesh Kaul serves as the senior vice president of Business Solutions Group at CaféX. He is responsible for evangelizing, implementing and extending the company's vision and direction for business process solutions across leading verticals and functions.
Previously a co-founder and CEO at Vayyoo, Inc., Shailesh utilized his strong business acumen and propensity for innovation to bring the leading-edge Vayyoo Rooms enterprise platform to market in combination with a broad set of trusted customer relations. The company was acquired by CaféX Communications and resides within the Chime portfolio.
Shailesh has served in senior management and engineering roles at BlackBerry, Nortel Networks, HCL Technologies and NIC. He has extensive experience in building high performance teams, successfully executing on full product delivery cycles across various organizations. Shailesh is a graduate in Electrical Engineering, with a master’s degree in Computer Sciences and an MBA degree from Queen’s University, Canada.













 Headquarters

New York
CaféX Communications, Inc.  521 Fifth Avenue, Suite 822New York, NY 10175.
+1-646-351-0511
info@cafex.com



 Europe Offices

London
CaféX Communications, Ltd.  1 Change Alley London, England, EC3V 3ND.


Cardiff
CaféX Communications, Ltd.   Building 3 Eastern Business ParkWern Fawr LaneSt Mellons, Cardiff, Wales, CF3 5EA.
info@cafex.com



 Other Offices

Boston
CaféX Communications, Inc.   745 Atlantic Avenue   Boston, MA 02111
+1-646-351-0511
info@cafex.com


Canada
CaféX Communications, Inc.   11 Hines Road Ottawa, Suite 201  Ontario, K2K 2W5 







Board of Directors



Rami Musallam
Co-Founder, President & CEO
more info





Rami Musallam
Co-Founder, President & CEO
Rami Musallam is president and chief executive officer of CaféX Communications. He co-founded CaféX in 2013 and has served as CEO for the past 17 years, beginning with Thrupoint, Inc. Prior to joining Thrupoint in 1996, Rami was vice president of Global Intranet Communications for Morgan Stanley.
At CaféX, Rami and the company's leaders are focused on creating innovative software that makes it easier for companies to transform digital engagement. Prior to CaféX, Rami drove Thrupoint's evolution into a global, strategic IT consulting firm and later a leader in customer experience management solutions. Rami serves as a Corporate Advisory Board member for Inwood House, a leader and innovator in teen pregnancy prevention, youth development, and family support.









Guy Chiarello
President, First Data Corporation
more info





Guy Chiarello
President, First Data Corporation
Guy Chiarello is president of First Data Corporation. He joined the company in July 2013. As a member of the Management Committee, Chiarello focuses on innovation, product development and technological systems, helping First Data elevate them all to world-class standards. His role is to engage with customers and business leaders to create and enhance the many new solutions First Data plans to bring to market.
Most recently, Chiarello was the chief information officer at JPMorgan Chase (JPMC), where he had firm wide responsibility for technology across seven lines of business in more than 60 countries. As CIO at JPMC, he oversaw a vast infrastructure and drove innovation, helping the bank launch a highly successful suite of digital banking platforms, including the award-winning Chase Mobile App Suite, which grew its customer base to greater than 10 million users in just a couple years.
Chiarello is a trailblazer in both business and technology in the financial services industry and brings more than 30 years of proven and deep expertise to First Data. Chiarello personally has been recognized in multiple years by Institutional Investor magazine among its "Tech 50" and by Information Week as a "Global CIO Top 50," and is considered a key advisor by many of the leading technology company CEOs in the industry.









Cindy Padnos
Founder & Managing Partner, Illuminate Ventures
more info





Cindy Padnos
Founder & Managing Partner, Illuminate Ventures
Cindy Padnos is the founder and managing partner of Illuminate Ventures, an early stage venture capital firm focused on finding, funding and accelerating great teams leveraging cloud and mobile computing technologies. The firm has a history of startup investment success in the enterprise software sector with a particular emphasis on solutions that leverage data analytics to improve business results and that creatively apply consumer technologies to the enterprise. Cindy has helped raise and deploy hundreds of millions in venture funding to help dozens of startups reach successful outcomes, including recent portfolio companies Red Aril (acquired by Hearst Corporation) and WildPockets (acquired by Autodesk). She currently is a board member for portfolio companies BrightEdge, CafeX Communications, ChannelEyes, Hoopla, Peerlyst, Yozio and Xactly Corporation.
Cindy has been named one of the Top 12 B2B investors by VentureBeat, Most Influential Women in Technology by Fast Company, designated a Power Player in Cloud Computing by AlwaysOn and was named to The New York Times list of the Most Influential Women in Silicon Valley. Her entrepreneurial career includes notable high tech startup successes as VP of Marketing at Scopus Technology (IPO later acquired by Oracle), CEO of Acumen and founder and CEO of Vivant (acquired by EVLV, now part of Oracle).
Cindy is a magna cum laude graduate of the University of Michigan and serves on the Business Board of Advisors for Carnegie Mellon’s Tepper School of Business where she received her MBA/MSIA with honors.  She is also an advisor to several nonprofit startup accelerators and entrepreneurship centers and is the author of the widely cited white paper "High Performance Entrepreneurs: Women in High-tech."









Cliff Higgerson
Venture Partner at Walden International
more info





Cliff Higgerson
Venture Partner at Walden International
Cliff has more than 35 years of experience in research, consulting, planning and venture investing. Combining the market insight of an analyst with a keen ability to identify blockbuster technologies early in their development, Cliff has backed some of the most successful companies in the communications industry. He focuses his investments on telecommunications with an emphasis on carrier systems and equipment.
Past investments and board seats include Astute Networks, Hatteras Networks, Kotura, Lambda OpticalSystems, Ygnition, and Xtera Communications. Prior to investments include such industry leaders as Advanced Fibre Communications (Nasdaq: AFCI); America Online; Ciena (Nasdaqa; CIEN); Digital Island (acquired by Cable & Wireless); Digital Microwave, now Stralex Networks (Nasdaq: STXN); Tellabs (Nasdaq: TLAB); MCI (Nasdaq: MCIP); Octel (NYSE: OTL); and Tut Systems (Nasdaq: TUTS).
Cliff was a Founding Partner of ComVentures and a General Partner with Vanguard Venture Partners. He has also served as a Managing Partner and Director of Research for Hambrecht & Quist, and as a Special Limited Partner and Director of the Communications Group for L.F. Rothschild, Unterberg, Towbin. Cliff holds an MBA from the University of California at Berkeley, and a BS from the University of Illinois.









Nathan McKinley
Vice President USAA
more info





Nathan McKinley
Vice President USAA
Nathan McKinley, Head of Corporate Development, leads a team of 14 professionals focused on venture capital, mergers/acquisitions, joint ventures and intellectual property transactions. USAA is proud to serve more than 11 million current and former members of the military and their families.
Nathan joined USAA in 2006 and has managed Bank Product Management, Retail Marketing, Enterprise Innovation, and the Military Affinity Group. He was previously Senior Vice President of Product Development for Bank of America. Nathan started his financial services career at MBNA America in 1990 (acquired by Bank of America in 2006) and with 16 years at MBNA, worked in many different areas. Key areas included: business development, collections, credit, customer service, finance, group administration, investor relations, Internet marketing, new affinity group sales, and retention.
Nathan graduated with honors from Georgetown University with a finance degree and received his MBA from the University of Baltimore. Nathan is also a Board Member of ID.me.
Nathan McKinley, Head of Corporate Development, leads a team of 14 professionals focused on venture capital, mergers/acquisitions, joint ventures and intellectual property transactions. USAA is proud to serve more than 11 million current and former members of the military and their families.
Nathan joined USAA in 2006 and has managed Bank Product Management, Retail Marketing, Enterprise Innovation, and the Military Affinity Group. He was previously Senior Vice President of Product Development for Bank of America. Nathan started his financial services career at MBNA America in 1990 (acquired by Bank of America in 2006) and with 16 years at MBNA, worked in many different areas. Key areas included: business development, collections, credit, customer service, finance, group administration, investor relations, Internet marketing, new affinity group sales, and retention.
Nathan graduated with honors from Georgetown University with a finance degree and received his MBA from the University of Baltimore. Nathan is also a Board Member of ID.me.









Ken Tuchman
Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, TeleTech
more info





Ken Tuchman
Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, TeleTech
Kenneth D. Tuchman is the Founder, Chairman and CEO of TeleTech Holdings, Inc., a leading global provider of customer
experience, engagement, growth and digital transformation
solutions. Since the company was founded in 1982, Tuchman has
driven technology and service innovation into every phase of the
customer experience journey. With a holistic, technology-enabled
strategy to execution approach, TeleTech has become the go-to
partner for many of the most dynamic and customer-focused
brands on earth. Listed on NASDAQ (TTEC) TeleTech operates in 82 countries with over 40,000
employees.

With his innate understanding of power of technology to connect customers directly with brands,
Tuchman saw the customer experience revolution on the horizon and built a company to lead it.
His perspective on the importance of the customer as a strategic asset fuels TeleTech's culture of
technology innovation and operational excellence.

For over three decades, the company has progressively developed strategic solutions across
every stage of the customer lifecycle and interaction channel.  With a holistic approach that
integrates strategy, process, technology and execution capabilities, TeleTech helps its Global
1000 clients turn the complexities of customer care into a seamless competitive advantage that
delivers customer loyalty and long-term sustainable economic growth.

Tuchman has served as chairman of the board of directors and chief executive officer for
TeleTech continually since its formation. He oversees the TeleTech Community Foundation, a
not-for- profit organization dedicated to building stronger communities through education. Mr.
Tuchman is also on the Board of the Denver Center For Performing Arts (DCPA), and is the
Founder of Mantucket Capital, a private investment firm with interests in energy, natural
resources, agriculture, infrastructure, healthcare, technology and other sectors.










Yasufumi Hirai
CIO, CISO and Group EVP, Rakuten, Inc
more info





Yasufumi Hirai
CIO, CISO and Group EVP, Rakuten, Inc
Yasufumi Hirai is chief information officer (CIO), chief information security officer (CISO) and group executive vice president of global internet services company Rakuten, Inc.
He is also the president of Rakuten’s Media & Communications Company, which includes responsibility for Rakuten Mobile, Rakuten Communications and global voice and messaging service Viber.
In his role as CIO and CISO, Yasu is responsible for the evolution of Rakuten ecosystem services, as well as managing group-wide IT infrastructure and information security governance.
























CaféX Communications Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 27, 2017 5:38 PM ET
Software

Company Overview of CaféX Communications Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
CaféX Communications Inc. provides software solutions for Web real-time communication and mobile business-to-consumer collaboration for various applications. The company offers CaféX Fusion, a software platform that embeds real-time collaboration capabilities within business applications across mobile and fixed endpoints, such as smartphone, tablet, desktop, and other digital channels. Its products include CaféX Fusion Client SDK (software development kit) that provides APIs to enable Web developers embed communication-enable business applications; CaféX Fusion Palettes, an application platform that extends the power of enterprises’ existing contact center and communications systems to new c...
CaféX Communications Inc. provides software solutions for Web real-time communication and mobile business-to-consumer collaboration for various applications. The company offers CaféX Fusion, a software platform that embeds real-time collaboration capabilities within business applications across mobile and fixed endpoints, such as smartphone, tablet, desktop, and other digital channels. Its products include CaféX Fusion Client SDK (software development kit) that provides APIs to enable Web developers embed communication-enable business applications; CaféX Fusion Palettes, an application platform that extends the power of enterprises’ existing contact center and communications systems to new customer channels; CaféX Fusion Application Server that optimizes the performance of real-time applications that combine voice, video, data, and other next-generation network services with Web 2.0 capabilities; and CaféX Fusion Service Broker, a central point of orchestration for various applications and forms of communication within an organization. The company serves financial services, such as private banking, customer service, and mobile banking; healthcare, including telemedicine and patient portals; and insurance and retail markets. CaféX Communications Inc. has strategic partnerships with Cisco, Siemens, and Aceyus. The company was incorporated in 2013 and is based in New York, New York with regional offices in Europe, the Middle East, and Africa.
Detailed Description


1040 Avenue of the Americas19th FloorNew York, NY 10018United StatesFounded in 2013



Phone: 646-351-0511

Fax: 646-351-0700

www.cafex.com







Key Executives for CaféX Communications Inc.




Mr. Rami Musallam


      	Chief Executive Officer, President and Director
      


Age: 52
        







Mr. Thomas O'Flaherty


      	Chief Financial Officer, Chief Administrative Officer and Director
      


Age: 56
        







Mr. Daniel L. Solito


      	Chief Operating Officer and Senior Vice President
      








Mr. David Jodoin


      	Chief Technology Officer and Senior Vice President of Engineering
      


Age: 53
        







Mr. Sajeel Hussain


      	Chief Marketing Officer and Executive Vice President of Strategic Partnerships
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 

CaféX Communications Inc. Key Developments

CafeX Communications Launches Partner Program for Microsoft Dynamics 365 Live Assist
May 9 17
CafeX Communications has unveiled a new program for Microsoft Dynamics 365 partners to accelerate market growth of omnichannel customer experience solutions. This global program provides Microsoft partners with comprehensive tools and support to address strong interest among businesses for live chat, co-browsing and other personalized customer assistance solutions from within the Dynamics 365 platform. CafeX Live Assist is Microsoft's preferred omnichannel solution for Dynamics 365, co-developed by the two firms with a jointly committed roadmap for ongoing enhancements. As an outcome of the program, partners can add value to their customers' operations with new avenues for high-margin offerings to accelerate business growth. The program offers two levels -- strategic and standard - to meet the various Go-To-Market strategies of global partners. CafeX makes it easier for companies to enhance live engagement within web and mobile applications.


CafeX Communications Introduces Chime Spaces™ at Enterprise Connect 2017
Mar 29 17
CafeX Communications introduced Chime Spaces™ at Enterprise Connect 2017. Chime Spaces creates organized collaboration environments to help people work together more effectively to drive business outcomes. Customers, employees and teams can connect within centralized online spaces that are easily configured to suit specific workflows. Accessible from the cloud on web browsers and mobile devices, Chime™ workspaces help stakeholders step through a given process, bringing information and actions to people's attention at the right time. Participants can collaborate face-to-face with a single click, share and access digital media, request approvals, review documents and trigger notifications among other tasks. Ready-made templates make it simple for business users to set up spaces, orchestrate various activities and track milestones in order to expedite processes. Chime Spaces has many applications within financial services, healthcare, insurance, retail and other industries. For example, a space could be set up for a kitchen renovation project, giving the customer, home improvement service team and contractors one central location to share ideas, interact and make decisions, from design planning through to installation. Because these spaces are persistent, participants have a comprehensive view of past and present activities, even after a project is completed.


CafeX Communications Announces Availability of Omni-Channel Service for Microsoft Dynamics 365
Mar 14 17
CafeX Communications announced the availability of CafeX Live Assist for Microsoft Dynamics 365 for public preview. The omni-channel solution is now open for free 30-day trials globally. Watch this video to see how to get started. It is orderable in North America and Europe with expansion slated for Asia and other regions starting later this month. As part of the global launch campaign, CafeX is showcasing Live Assist for Dynamics 365 this week at the eXtreme365 conference in Lisbon, Portugal. The integrated service offers customers one-click personalized assistance from an agent while browsing a company's website or mobile app. From within Dynamics 365, the agent can provide helpful tips over web chat, see exactly what the customer sees, spotlight important information, as well as share images, links and other relevant content within the customer's application to resolve issues faster with higher online conversion rates. Along with increased customer satisfaction, this integrated service also helps agents become more productive. An agent can access co-browse, chat and other customer engagement options directly within Unified Service Desk or web clients for Dynamics 365 without switching to a different screen or application. From an administrative viewpoint, deployment and management are streamlined through single sign-on and a unified provisioning flow through Microsoft Office 365. This integrated solution also creates new business opportunities for Microsoft Partner Network members looking to expand their omni-channel capabilities. CafeX is eager to work with these partners to bring the solution's full power to bear in customer implementations through value-added services. The company’s goal is to help its customers deliver world-class omni-channel experiences. This new integrated offer from CafeX for Microsoft Dynamics 365, combined with industry and implementation expertise, helps customers deliver the types of experiences that increase satisfaction, loyalty, and value for their customers.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 'LightArrow Inc. United States @RISK, Inc. United States @YourGate LLC United States 100Insights, Inc. United States 101 Edu, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target





Merger/Acquisition

			      January 24, 2017
			    
ChimeSpaces



Private Placement

			      November 28, 2016
			    
--





Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact CaféX Communications Inc., please visit www.cafex.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close




























Cafex Communications Inc: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback























cafex communications inc
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Technology
Industry: Software
Sub-Industry: Application Software
Cafex Communications Inc. creates and develops software. The Company offers services which includes software platforms, software development kit, application server, and customer service, mobile banking, telemedicine,voice, and video calling solutions. Cafex Communications serves customers worldwide.




Corporate Information
Address:

521 Fifth Avenue
Suite 822
New York, NY 10175
United States


Phone:
1-646-351-0511


Fax:
-


Web url:
www.cafex.com























From The Web












Press Releases




CafeX Unveils New Version of Omnichannel Solution for Dynamics 365 at Microsoft Inspire

Jul 11, 2017



eBECS Joins CafeX Partner Program to Deliver Advanced Omnichannel Solution

Jun 21, 2017



Web Real-Time Communication Market Worth 6.49 Billion USD by 2022

Jun 07, 2017



CafeX Launches Partner Program for Live Assist™ for Microsoft Dynamics 365

May 05, 2017







Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data











































CafeX Communications Inc. v. Amazon Web Services, Inc. | United States Courts Archive










CafeX Communications Inc. v. Amazon Web Services, Inc.

























Case Details



CourtSouthern District of New York
Docket number1:17-cv-01349
Date case filed2017-02-22
Date case closed
Date of latest filing
Assigned toJudge Victor Marrero
Case cause15:1051 Trademark Infringement
Nature of suit840 Trademark
Jury demandBoth
Demand
JurisdictionFederal Question




Case Docket
Case Parties and Attorneys


Case Parties


Party: CafeX Communications Inc.Party type: Plaintiff
Attorney name: Mark PasslerAttorney Contact:Akerman LLP777 S Flagler Dr Suite 1100 West TowerWest Palm Beach, FL 33401(561)-653-5000Email: [email protected]LEAD ATTORNEY
ATTORNEY TO BE NOTICEDAttorney name: Ira Stephen SacksAttorney Contact:Akerman LLP666 Fifth Avenue 20th FloorNew York, NY 10103(212) 880-3800Fax: (212) 880-8965Email: [email protected]ATTORNEY TO BE NOTICEDAttorney name: Patricia CarlsonAttorney Contact:Akerman LLP777 S Flagler Dr Suite 1100 West TowerWest Palm Beach, FL 33401(561)-653-5000Email: [email protected]ATTORNEY TO BE NOTICEDAttorney name: David S. BrafmanAttorney Contact:Akerman Senterfitt222 Lakeview Avenue, Suite 400West Palm Beach, FL 33401(561) 653-5000Fax: (561) 659-6313Email: [email protected]ATTORNEY TO BE NOTICED
Party: Amazon Web Services, Inc.Party type: Defendant
Attorney name: Justin NelsonAttorney Contact:Susman Godfrey LLP (TX)1000 Louisiana StreetSuite 5100Houston, TX 77002(713)-653-7895Fax: (713)-654-6666Email: [email protected]LEAD ATTORNEY
ATTORNEY TO BE NOTICEDAttorney name: Chanler Ashton LanghamAttorney Contact:Susman Godfrey L.L.P.1000 Louisiana Street, Suite 5100Houston, TX 77002(713) 653-7839Fax: (713) 654-6666Email: [email protected]ATTORNEY TO BE NOTICEDAttorney name: Drew D HansenAttorney Contact:Susman Godfrey LLP (Seattle)1201 Third AvenueSuite 3800Seattle, WA 98101(206)-516-3880Fax: (206)-516-3883Email: [email protected]ATTORNEY TO BE NOTICEDAttorney name: Glenn Charles BridgmanAttorney Contact:Susman Godfrey LLP(CA)1901 Avenue of The Stars, Ste 950Los Angeles, CA 90067(310)-789-3104Fax: (310)-789-3150Email: [email protected]ATTORNEY TO BE NOTICEDAttorney name: Lucas Estlund IssacharoffAttorney Contact:Susman Godfrey LLP (NYC)1301 Avenue of the Americas, 32nd FloorNew York, NY 10019(917)-826-7330Fax: (212)-336-8340Email: [email protected]ATTORNEY TO BE NOTICED




Case Docket


DocketItemDate FiledDocumentAvailableShortDescriptionLong Description

12017-02-22
COMPLAINT against Amazon Web Services, Inc.. (Filing Fee $ 400.00, Receipt Number 0208-13344375)Document filed by CafeX Communications Inc..(Brafman, David) (Entered: 02/22/2017)
22017-02-22
RULE 7.1 CORPORATE DISCLOSURE STATEMENT. Identifying Corporate Parent TeleTech Holdings Inc. for CafeX Communications Inc.. Document filed by CafeX Communications Inc..(Brafman, David) (Entered: 02/22/2017)
32017-02-22
CIVIL COVER SHEET filed. (Brafman, David) (Entered: 02/22/2017)
42017-02-23
REQUEST FOR ISSUANCE OF SUMMONS as to Amazon Web Services, Inc., re: 1 Complaint. Document filed by CafeX Communications Inc.. (Brafman, David) (Entered: 02/23/2017)
52017-02-23
AO 120 FORM TRADEMARK - NOTICE OF SUBMISSION BY ATTORNEY. AO 120 Form Patent/Trademark for case opening submitted to court for review.(Brafman, David) (Entered: 02/23/2017)
62017-02-24
ELECTRONIC SUMMONS ISSUED as to Amazon Web Services, Inc. (kl) (Entered: 02/24/2017)
72017-02-24
AO 120 FORM TRADEMARK - CASE OPENING - SUBMITTED. In compliance with the provisions of 15 U.S.C. 1116, the Director of the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office is hereby advised that a court action has been filed on the following trademark(s) in the U.S. District Court Southern District of New York. Director of the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office electronically notified via Notice of Electronic Filing (NEF). (kl) (Entered: 02/24/2017)
82017-03-02
FILING ERROR - WRONG EVENT TYPE SELECTED FROM MENU - MOTION for Preliminary Injunction (Memorandum of Law) (electronically filed as instructed by the Court as the parties work on briefing schedule for Order to Show Cause). Document filed by CafeX Communications Inc..(Brafman, David) Modified on 3/31/2017 (ldi). (Entered: 03/02/2017)
92017-03-02
DECLARATION of Daniel Solito in Support re: 8 MOTION for Preliminary Injunction (Memorandum of Law) (electronically filed as instructed by the Court as the parties work on briefing schedule for Order to Show Cause).. Document filed by CafeX Communications Inc.. (Attachments: # 1 Exhibit A. CafeX Press Release, # 2 Exhibit B. CafeX Product Webpage, # 3 Exhibit C. AWS Information, # 4 Exhibit D. Geekwire Article Regarding AWS, # 5 Exhibit E. AWS Product Webpage, # 6 Exhibit F. AWS Product Information, # 7 Exhibit G. Communication dated Feb. 16, 2017, # 8 Exhibit H. Communication dated Feb. 14, 2017, # 9 Exhibit I. Communication dated Feb. 14, 2017, # 10 Exhibit J. Communication dated Feb. 20, 2017, # 11 Exhibit K. Analyst Blog, # 12 Exhibit L. Communication dated Feb. 14, 2017, # 13 Exhibit M. Communication dated Feb. 14, 2017, # 14 Exhibit N. Floor Plan for March 27, 2017 Trade Show, # 15 Exhibit O. Demand Letter to AWS dated Feb. 16, 2017, # 16 Exhibit P. Pictures from 2016 Trade Show, # 17 Exhibit Q. AWS Press Release, # 18 Exhibit R. Email Exchange Between CafeX and AWS's Mr. DeMaio)(Brafman, David) (Entered: 03/02/2017)
102017-03-02
DECLARATION of David Brafman in Support re: 8 MOTION for Preliminary Injunction (Memorandum of Law) (electronically filed as instructed by the Court as the parties work on briefing schedule for Order to Show Cause).. Document filed by CafeX Communications Inc.. (Attachments: # 1 Exhibit 1. Communication dated Feb. 16, 2017, # 2 Exhibit 2. Communication dated March 1, 2017)(Brafman, David) (Entered: 03/02/2017)
112017-03-02
DECLARATION of David Brafman (Supplemental) in Support re: 8 MOTION for Preliminary Injunction (Memorandum of Law) (electronically filed as instructed by the Court as the parties work on briefing schedule for Order to Show Cause).. Document filed by CafeX Communications Inc.. (Brafman, David) (Entered: 03/02/2017)
122017-03-03
ORDER. The parties are hereby directed to appear on March 24, 2017 at 4:15 p.m. for a hearing concerning Plaintiff's Application for a Preliminary Injunction filed on March 2, 2017. It is further ordered that Defendant Amazon Web Services file its Opposition to Plaintiff CafeX Communications' s Motion for a Preliminary Injunction by Monday, March 13, 2017. Plaintiff CafeX Communications' s Reply in Support of its Motion for a Preliminary Injunction must be filed by Friday, March 17, 2017. So ordered. (Oral Argument set for 3/24/2017 at 04:15 PM before Judge Victor Marrero.), (Responses due by 3/13/2017. Replies due by 3/17/2017.) (Signed by Judge Victor Marrero on 3/3/2017) (rjm) (Entered: 03/06/2017)
132017-03-06
NOTICE OF APPEARANCE by Lucas Estlund Issacharoff on behalf of Amazon Web Services, Inc.. (Issacharoff, Lucas) (Entered: 03/06/2017)
142017-03-07
ENDORSED LETTER addressed to Judge Victor Marrero from Justin A. Nelson dated 3/6/17 re: Defendant Amazon Web Services, Inc. files this request for a short four-day extension to the briefing schedule on Plaintiff CafeX's Motion for Preliminary Injunction. ENDORSEMENT: The Clerk of Court is directed to enter into the public record of this action this letter above submitted to the Court by defendants. (Signed by Judge Victor Marrero on 3/7/2017) (mro) (Entered: 03/08/2017)
152017-03-07
ENDORSED LETTER addressed to Judge Victor Marrero from David Brafman dated 3/7/2017 re: Plaintiff CafeX respectfully requests the Court to deny AWS's motion to extend the schedule to its benefit, providing it with disproportionate briefing time and shortening the Court's time to consider the papers. ENDORSEMENT: The Clerk of Court is directed to enter into the public record of this action this letter above submitted to the Court by plaintiff. (Signed by Judge Victor Marrero on 3/7/2017) (mro) (Entered: 03/08/2017)
162017-03-07
ENDORSED LETTER addressed to Judge Victor Marrero from Justin A. Nelson dated 3/7/17 re: Amazon requests a short four-day extension to file its Response to CafeX's Preliminary Injunction Motion. ENDORSEMENT: Request GRANTED. The briefing schedule for the injunctive relief motion herein is modified as follows: defendant's response 3-17-17; plaintiff's reply 3-22-17. ( Responses due by 3/17/2017, Replies due by 3/22/2017.) (Signed by Judge Victor Marrero on 3/7/2017) (mro) (Entered: 03/08/2017)
172017-03-08
NOTICE OF APPEARANCE by Ira Stephen Sacks on behalf of CafeX Communications Inc.. (Sacks, Ira) (Entered: 03/08/2017)
182017-03-09
MOTION for Patricia M. Carlson to Appear Pro Hac Vice . Filing fee $ 200.00, receipt number 0208-13405436. Motion and supporting papers to be reviewed by Clerk's Office staff. Document filed by CafeX Communications Inc.. (Attachments: # 1 Text of Proposed Order, # 2 Exhibit A. Certificate of Good Standing, # 3 Exhibit B. Affidavit of Patricia M. Carlson)(Carlson, Patricia) (Entered: 03/09/2017)
192017-03-09
FILING ERROR - DEFICIENT DOCKET ENTRY - MOTION for Mark D. Passler to Appear Pro Hac Vice . Filing fee $ 200.00, receipt number 0208-13405742. Motion and supporting papers to be reviewed by Clerk's Office staff. Document filed by CafeX Communications Inc.. (Attachments: # 1 Text of Proposed Order, # 2 Exhibit A. Certificates of Good Standing, # 3 Exhibit B. Affidavit of Mark D. Passler)(Passler, Mark) Modified on 3/10/2017 (bcu). (Entered: 03/09/2017)
202017-03-10
AMENDED MOTION for Mark D. Passler to Appear Pro Hac Vice . Motion and supporting papers to be reviewed by Clerk's Office staff. Document filed by CafeX Communications Inc.. (Attachments: # 1 Text of Proposed Order, # 2 Exhibit A. Certificates of Good Standing, # 3 Exhibit B. Affidavit of Mark D. Passler)(Passler, Mark) (Entered: 03/10/2017)
212017-03-10
MOTION for Justin Adatto Nelson to Appear Pro Hac Vice . Filing fee $ 200.00, receipt number 0208-13408824. Motion and supporting papers to be reviewed by Clerk's Office staff. Document filed by Amazon Web Services, Inc.. (Attachments: # 1 Affidavit, # 2 Text of Proposed Order)(Nelson, Justin) (Entered: 03/10/2017)
222017-03-13
ORDER FOR MOTION FOR ADMISSION PRO HAC VICE OF PATRICIA M. CARLSON granting 18 Motion for Patricia M. Carlson to Appear Pro Hac Vice. (Signed by Judge Victor Marrero on 3/10/2017) (ras) (Entered: 03/13/2017)
232017-03-13
ORDER FOR ADMISSION PRO HAC VICE FOR JUSTIN A. NELSON: granting 21 Motion for Justin A. Nelson to Appear Pro Hac Vice. (Signed by Judge Victor Marrero on 03/13/2017) (ap) (Entered: 03/15/2017)
242017-03-13
ORDER FOR MOTION FOR ADMISSION PRO HAC VICE OF MARK D. PASSLER: granting 20 Motion for Mark D. Passler to Appear Pro Hac Vice. (Signed by Judge Victor Marrero on 03/13/2017) (ap) (Entered: 03/15/2017)
252017-03-15
MOTION for Drew D. Hansen to Appear Pro Hac Vice . Filing fee $ 200.00, receipt number 0208-13423167. Motion and supporting papers to be reviewed by Clerk's Office staff. Document filed by Amazon Web Services, Inc.. (Attachments: # 1 Affidavit of Drew D. Hansen, # 2 Text of Proposed Order)(Hansen, Drew) (Entered: 03/15/2017)
262017-03-16
ORDER FOR ADMISSION PRO HAC VICE granting 25 Motion for Drew D. Hansen to Appear Pro Hac Vice. (Signed by Judge Victor Marrero on 3/16/2017) (cla) (Entered: 03/16/2017)
272017-03-17
NOTICE OF APPEARANCE by Chanler Ashton Langham on behalf of Amazon Web Services, Inc.. (Langham, Chanler) (Entered: 03/17/2017)
292017-03-22
ENDORSED LETTER addressed to Judge Victor Marrero from Lucas Issacharoff dated 3/20/2017 re: Clarification of Exhibits attached to Declaration. ENDORSEMENT: Request GRANTED. (Signed by Judge Victor Marrero on 3/21/2017) (cla) (Entered: 03/22/2017)
302017-03-22
DECLARATION of Jennie Tietema in Opposition re: 8 MOTION for Preliminary Injunction (Memorandum of Law) (electronically filed as instructed by the Court as the parties work on briefing schedule for Order to Show Cause).. Document filed by Amazon Web Services, Inc.. (Issacharoff, Lucas) (Entered: 03/22/2017)
312017-03-22
NOTICE of Supplemental Authority re: 28 Response to Motion,,. Document filed by Amazon Web Services, Inc.. (Issacharoff, Lucas) (Entered: 03/22/2017)
322017-03-22
REPLY MEMORANDUM OF LAW in Support re: 8 MOTION for Preliminary Injunction (Memorandum of Law) (electronically filed as instructed by the Court as the parties work on briefing schedule for Order to Show Cause). . Document filed by CafeX Communications Inc.. (Brafman, David) (Entered: 03/22/2017)
332017-03-22
DECLARATION of Daniel Solito in Support re: 8 MOTION for Preliminary Injunction (Memorandum of Law) (electronically filed as instructed by the Court as the parties work on briefing schedule for Order to Show Cause).. Document filed by CafeX Communications Inc.. (Brafman, David) (Entered: 03/22/2017)
342017-03-22
DECLARATION of Michael Rappeport in Support re: 8 MOTION for Preliminary Injunction (Memorandum of Law) (electronically filed as instructed by the Court as the parties work on briefing schedule for Order to Show Cause).. Document filed by CafeX Communications Inc.. (Attachments: # 1 Exhibit A - C.V. of Michael Rappeport)(Brafman, David) (Entered: 03/22/2017)
352017-03-22
DECLARATION of David Brafman in Support re: 8 MOTION for Preliminary Injunction (Memorandum of Law) (electronically filed as instructed by the Court as the parties work on briefing schedule for Order to Show Cause).. Document filed by CafeX Communications Inc.. (Attachments: # 1 Exhibit 1 - Google search results)(Brafman, David) (Entered: 03/22/2017)
362017-03-24
NOTICE of of Supplemental Authority In Opposition to Order To Show Cause for A Preliminary Injunction. Document filed by Amazon Web Services, Inc.. (Attachments: # 1 Exhibit A)(Issacharoff, Lucas) (Entered: 03/24/2017)
372017-03-24
STIPULATION EXTENDING TIME TO RESPOND TO COMPLAINT: IT IS HEREBY STIPULATED AND AGREED by and between the undersigned attorneys for the parties that the time within which Defendant Amazon Web Services, Inc. ("Amazon") may move, answer, or otherwise respond to the Complaint is hereby extended up to and including April 21, 2017. No provision of this Stipulation and Order shall be construed as a waiver of, and Amazon expressly reserves, any and all defenses. There has been no previous request for extension of time to answer in connection with this matter. (Amazon Web Services, Inc. answer due 4/21/2017.) (Signed by Judge Victor Marrero on 3/24/2017) (cla) (Entered: 03/24/2017)
382017-03-24
ORDER denying 8 Motion for Preliminary Injunction. Upon review of the parties' submissions, the oral arguments, and other materials in the public record of this action, and for the reasons stated by the Court at the hearing on March 24, 2017 on Plaintiff CafeX Communications's ("CafeX") Motion for a Preliminary Injunction to prevent defendant Amazon Web Services, Inc. ("Amazon") from continuing to market its Amazon Chime product ("Motion," Dkt. No. 8.), CafeX's Motion is DENIED. (Signed by Judge Victor Marrero on 3/24/2017) (cla) (Entered: 03/24/2017)
392017-03-28
RESPONSE to Motion re: 8 MOTION for Preliminary Injunction (Memorandum of Law) (electronically filed as instructed by the Court as the parties work on briefing schedule for Order to Show Cause). . Document filed by Amazon Web Services, Inc.. (Attachments: # 1 Affidavit of Jennie Tietema, # 2 Affidavit Dr. Stephen Nowlis, # 3 Affidavit of Lucas Issacharoff (Pt 1), # 4 Affidavit of Lucas Issacharoff (Pt 2), # 5 Affidavit of Lucas Issacharoff (Pt 3), # 6 Affidavit of Lucas Issacharoff (Pt 4), # 7 Affidavit of Lucas Issacharoff (Pt 5))(Nelson, Justin) (Entered: 03/28/2017)
39.1
Affidavit of Jennie Tietema
39.2
Affidavit Dr. Stephen Nowlis
39.3
Affidavit of Lucas Issacharoff (Pt 1)
39.4
Affidavit of Lucas Issacharoff (Pt 2)
39.5
Affidavit of Lucas Issacharoff (Pt 3)
39.6
Affidavit of Lucas Issacharoff (Pt 4)
39.7
Affidavit of Lucas Issacharoff (Pt 5)
402017-03-28
DECLARATION of Lucas Issacharoff of Costs Associated with Filing Revised Brief. Document filed by Amazon Web Services, Inc.. (Issacharoff, Lucas) (Entered: 03/28/2017)
412017-03-28
ENDORSED LETTER addressed to Judge Victor Marrero from Lucas Issacharoff dated 3/28/2017 re: Request that the Clerk of Court strike from the docket the original brief. ENDORSEMENT: SO ORDERED. The Clerk of Court is directed to remove from the docket of this action the defendant's brief filed under Docket No. 28. (Signed by Judge Victor Marrero on 3/28/2017) (cla) (Entered: 03/28/2017)
422017-03-29
AFFIDAVIT OF SERVICE of Summons, Complaint, Memorandum of Law In Support of Order to Show Cause for Preliminary Injunction, Declaration of Daniel Solito, Declaration of David Brafman, Supplemental Declaration of David Brafman served on Amazon Web Services, Inc. on March 3, 2017. Service was accepted by Corporation Service Company, Registered Agent. Document filed by CafeX Communications Inc.. (Brafman, David) (Entered: 03/29/2017)
432017-03-30
ORDER: As such, it is hereby ORDERED that counsel for defendant Amazon Web Services, Inc. ("Amazon") shall pay a monetary sanction via check in the amount of $1,048.09. The check shall be made payable to the Clerk of Court of the Southern District of New York to be paid within thirty days of the issuance of this order. Counsel for defendant Amazon is directed that if they mail the payment, they must also submit a copy of this Order. (Signed by Judge Victor Marrero on 3/30/2017) (cla) (Entered: 03/30/2017)
442017-03-31
CIVIL CASE MANAGEMENT PLAN AND SCHEDULING ORDER: This case is to be tried to a jury. Amended pleadings may be filed without leave of the Court until 5/1/2017. Joinder of additional parties to be accomplished by 5/1/2017. Depositions to be completed by 7/31/2017. All fact discovery is to be completed by not later than 7/31/2017. All expert discovery (ordinarily conducted following the completion of fact discovery) including parties' expert reports and depositions, witness lists and identification of documents pursuant to Fed. R. Civ. P. 26(a)(2), (3) and 36(b), is to be completed by 9/15/2017. Case Management Conference set for 8/11/2017 at 09:30 AM before Judge Victor Marrero. Do all parties consent to trial by a Magistrate Judge under 28 U.S.C. § 636(c)? No. Plaintiff submits that Defendant's suggestion of Summary Judgment and Daubert motions is a tactic to delay the trial of this matter, which should not be permitted. Plaintiff requests a status conference shortly after 9/15/2017, to discuss motion practice, if any, and trial. Defendant: Any Summary Judgment or Daubert motions filed by 10/13/2017. (Signed by Judge Victor Marrero on 3/31/2017) (mro) (Entered: 03/31/2017)
452017-04-10
MOTION for Glenn C. Bridgman to Appear Pro Hac Vice . Filing fee $ 200.00, receipt number 0208-13526487. Motion and supporting papers to be reviewed by Clerk's Office staff. Document filed by Amazon Web Services, Inc.. (Attachments: # 1 Affidavit of Glenn C. Bridgman In Support of Motion For Admission Pro Hac Vice, # 2 Text of Proposed Order)(Bridgman, Glenn) (Entered: 04/10/2017)
462017-04-11
ORDER FOR ADMISSION PRO HAC VICE FOR GLENN C. BRIDGMAN granting 45 Motion for Glenn C. Bridgman to Appear Pro Hac Vice. (Signed by Judge Victor Marrero on 4/11/2017) (cla) (Entered: 04/11/2017)
472017-04-21
RULE 7.1 CORPORATE DISCLOSURE STATEMENT. Identifying Corporate Parent Amazon.Com, Inc. for Amazon Web Services, Inc.. Document filed by Amazon Web Services, Inc..(Nelson, Justin) (Entered: 04/21/2017)
482017-04-21
ANSWER to 1 Complaint with JURY DEMAND. Document filed by Amazon Web Services, Inc..(Nelson, Justin) (Entered: 04/21/2017)

  













Who is CaféX Communications? – CafeX Customer Support





































 Who is CaféX Communications?

CaféX Communications, Inc. provides real-time customer engagement solutions. CaféX, the Enterprise Connect 2014 Best of Show winner, is a leader in collaborative in-app communications and advanced customer care technologies.
CaféX software products are currently resold by Cisco under an Applications Services OEM agreement.  Cisco and CaféX have several successful customers such as American Express (Credit), Citigroup (Private Banking), Wells Fargo (Banking). The joint list of prospects and successes are increasing rapidly.
As of April 2014, CaféX has approx. 75 employees with offices in New York, NY and Boston, MA as well as a development center in Cardiff, Wales UK. CaféX leads UC innovation as the 1st company to market a WebRTC Gateway, 1st company to enable WebRTC on iOS & Android and the 1st company to provide WebRTC across all major browsers (Internet Explorer & Safari included).  Integrations to UCCE and UCCX separate its products from other WebRTC companies, by enabling a tight integration to existing contact centers as required by the Fortune 1000. 






      
        Simon Maloney
       - January 14, 2016 15:35




    Have more questions? Submit a request


Comments








Powered by Zendesk


















CafeX Communications Inc. v. Amazon Web Services, Inc. Docket Item 1 | United States Courts Archive











You're viewing Docket Item 1 from the case CafeX Communications Inc. v. Amazon Web Services, Inc.. View the full docket and case details.
Download this document: 




























View plain text
David Brafman 
Mark D. Passler (pro hac vice to be filed) 
AKERMAN LLP 
777 South Flagler Drive 
Suite 1100, West Tower 
West Palm Beach, FL 33401 
Tel. (561) 653
-5000 
Fax (561) 659
-6313 
Email: [email protected] 
Email: [email protected] 

-and- 

Ira S. Sacks 
AKERMAN LLP 
666 Fifth Avenue, 20th Floor 
New York, NY 10103 
Tel. (212) 880
-3800 
Fax (212) 880
-8965 
Email: [email protected] 

Counsel for Plaintiff CafeX Communications, Inc. 

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT 
SOUTHERN DISTRICT OF NEW YORK 
CAFEX COMMUNICATIONS, INC. 

Plaintiff, 

-against- 

AMAZON WEB SERVICES, INC., 

Defendant. 




Case No. 

COMPLAINT 

JURY TRIAL DEMANDED




Plaintiff CafeX Communications, Inc. (“CafeX” or “Plaintiff”), files this complaint 
against Defendant Amazon Web Services, Inc. (“AWS” or “Defendant”) through its attorneys 
Akerman LLP and alleges on knowledge as to Plaintiff’s own acts and otherwise on information 
and belief as follows: Case 1:17-cv-01349-VM Document 1 Filed 02/22/17 Page 1 of 14
NATURE OF THE ACTION 
1.
This is an action for trademark infringement, false designation of origin, unfair 
competition, and deceptive acts and practices in violation of the laws of the United States and the 
State of New York. Plaintiff 
seeks a preliminary and permanent injunction and an award of 
profits, damages, and related relief. 
THE PARTIES 
2.
Plaintiff CafeX is a Delaware corporation with its principal place of business at 
521 Fifth Avenue, Suite 822, New York, NY 10175. 

3.
Defendant AWS is a Delaware corporation with its principal place of business at 
410 Terry Avenue North, Seattle, WA 98109
.

JURISDICTION AND VENUE 
4.
Plaintiff’s claims are predicated upon the Lanham Trademark Act of 1946, as 
amended, 15 U.S.C. §

1051, et seq., and related claims under the statutory and common law of 
the State of New York. This Court has subject matter jurisdiction pursuant to 28 U.S.C. §§ 1331 
and 1338(a). This Court has supplemental jurisdiction over Plaintiff's state and common law 
claims pursuant to 
28 U.S.C. § 1367(a).

5.
This Court has personal jurisdiction over Defendant because: (1) Defendant has 
committed, and continues to commit, acts of infringement in the Southern District of New York; 
and (2) Defendant has purposefully directed infringing conduct at Plaintiff in the State of New 
York, which caused and continues to cause Plaintiff harm in the State of New York. 
6.
Venue is proper under 28 U.S.C. §§ 1391 and 1400 at least because Defendant 
has committed acts of infringement in this district and Defendant is subject to personal 
jurisdiction in this district. 
Case 1:17-cv-01349-VM Document 1 Filed 02/22/17 Page 2 of 14
Plaintiff’s CHIME™ Trademarks 
7.
Plaintiff CafeX is a leader in the field of digital and online communication 
software and related services for businesses. 
8.
Among CafeX’s products and services are products and services for businesses 
that enable groups of people in disparate locations to collaborate with each other in real time. 
9.
One year ago, in February 2016, CafeX announced a new video collaboration 
software product and service that it branded CHIME™. 

10.
CafeX’s CHIME software allows employees and other business teams to 
communicate through video and voice conferencing, web chat, and document sharing. As CafeX 
explains in its marketing materials, CHIME software makes such collaboration simple. For 
example, joining a conference can be accomplished with a single click on your computer or 
phone. 
See
https://www.cafex.com/products-chime.php (“Chime provides a simpler way for 
people to collaborate via web, voice and video conferencing. Join meetings securely with one 
click from any web browser.”) 
11.
A month after its launch, CafeX promoted its CHIME software heavily at a trade 
conference called Enterprise Connect. 
12.
Enterprise Connect is the leading conference and exhibition for the business 
communications industry in North America. The conference features the latest communications 
and collaboration products, services, software and architecture for businesses. There are 
thousands of attendees, which include both vendors of communication products and services as 
well as corporate IT decision-makers. 
13.
At the 2016 Enterprise Connect, CafeX marketed the CHIME product and 
services not just at its booth, but throughout the trade show floor, including on a large video 
screen near the show floor entrance. Case 1:17-cv-01349-VM Document 1 Filed 02/22/17 Page 3 of 14
14. Each year, the organizers of the Enterprise Connect trade show award the 
exhibiting company with the most significant technological advancement within the enterprise 
communicati
ons and collaboration industry the Best of Enterprise Connect Award. The winner 
of the award is announced during an awards ceremony on the keynote stage at the trade show. 
15.
CafeX was publicly awarded the 2016 Best of Enterprise Connect Award for its 
CHIME communications solution, beating out much larger, household-name finalists that 
included Cisco, Vonage, and Sprint Business. 
16.
The success of CafeX’s CHIME product and service has led to important 
partnerships with third
-party companies. 
17.
CafeX has applied to register at the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office its marks 
CHIME™ and CAFEX CHIME™ as set forth below (collectively, the “CHIME Trademarks”): Mark Int. Class Goods or Services Application no. 
CHIME 38 Communication services, namely, transmission of 
voice, data, images, audio and video by means of 
wireless communication networks, and the 
Internet 
87/337,174 
CHIME 42 Providing temporary use of non-downloadable 
business communication software for 
electronically exchanging voice, data, video and 
graphi
cs accessible via computer, computer 
browser applications, and mobile devices; 
Providing temporary use of non
-downloadable 
business communication software for processing 
images, graphics, audio, video, and text; 
Providing temporary use of non
-downloadable 
business communication software, namely, video 
and audio conferencing software; Software as a 
service (SAAS) in the nature of hosted cloud
-
based computer software applications and 
enterprise software applications for enabling 
exchange of voice, data, video
and graphics 
accessible via computer, computer browser 
applications, and mobile devices 
87/337,193 
CHIME 9 Business communication software for 
electronically exchanging voice, data, video and 
87/337,261 Case 1:17-cv-01349-VM Document 1 Filed 02/22/17 Page 4 of 14
graphics accessible via computer, mobile, 
wireless, and telecommunication networks; 
business communication software for processing 
images, graphics, audio, video, and text; business 
communication software, namely, video and audio 
conferencing software 
CAFÉX 
CHIME 
38 Communication services, namely, transmission of 
voice, data, images, audio and video by means of 
wireless communication networks, and the 
Internet 
87/336,805 
CAFÉX 
CHIME 
42 Providing temporary use of non-downloadable 
business communication software for 
electronically exchanging voice, data, video and 
graphics accessible via computer, computer 
browser applications, and mobile devices; 
Providing temporary use of non
-downloadable 
business communication software for processing 
images, graphics, audio, video, and text; 
Providing temporary use of non-downloadable 
business communication software, namely, video 
and audio conferencing software; Software as a 
service (SAAS) in the nature of hosted cloud
-
based computer software applications and 
enterprise software applications for enabling 
exchange
of voice, data, video and graphics 
accessible via computer, computer browser 
applications, and mobile devices 
87/337,107 
CAFÉX 
CHIME 
9 Business communication software for 
electronically exchanging voice, data, video and 
graphics accessible via computer, 
mobile, 
wireless, and telecommunication networks; 
business communication software for processing 
images, graphics, audio, video, and text; business 
communication software, namely, video and audio 
conferencing software 
86/964,190 

18.
U.S. Trademark Application Serial No. 86/964,190 for CAFEX CHIME has been 
published and formally allowed and is expected to issue shortly. 
19.
In addition, CafeX sometimes uses the following logo form of the CHIME 
trademark: Case 1:17-cv-01349-VM Document 1 Filed 02/22/17 Page 5 of 14

20.
As a result of Plaintiff CafeX’s exclusive use and promotion of its products and 
services branded with the CHIME™ Trademarks, those marks have acquired significant value 
and recognition in the United States. 

21.
The CHIME™ Trademarks are well-known to the consuming public and trade as 
identifying and distinguishing Plaintiff CafeX exclusively and uniquely as the source and origin 
of the high quality goods and services to which they are applied. 

Defendant’s Illegal Conduct 
22. Last week, on February 14, 2017, Defendant AWS announced a new 
communications and collaboration software service for businesses that competes directly with 
CafeX’s CHIME product and service. 
23.
AWS could have named its new product and service practically anything. It 
chose, however, to blatantly infringe the CHIME Trademarks, marketing its product and service 
under the marks “CHIME” and “AMAZON CHIME” (the “Infringing Trademarks”). 
24.
AWS was aware of CafeX’s CHIME product and service, as well as the CHIME 
Trademarks, before it launched its competing and infringing product 
and service. 
25.
Not only is it essentially impossible for AWS to have been ignorant of CafeX’s 
CHIME product and service before launching its competing product and service in light of 
industry acclaim received by CafeX for its CHIME product and service over the past year, but an 
AWS employee with the title Principal Product Manager visited CafeX’s 2016 Enterprise 
Connect’s booth where CafeX’s CHIME product and service was being heavily promoted under 
the CHIME Trademarks. Case 1:17-cv-01349-VM Document 1 Filed 02/22/17 Page 6 of 14
26. AWS’s marketing for its new product and service touts similar functionality for 
the same target customers as CafeX’s CHIME product and service. 
See 
http://docs.aws.amazon.com/chime/latest/ug/what
-is-chime.html (“Amazon Chime is a secure, 
real-time, unified communications service that transforms meetings by making them more 
efficient and easier to conduct.”); https://chime.aws/ (“You can use Amazon Chime for online 
meetings, video conferencing, calls, chat, and to share content, both inside and outside your 
organization…. Meetings call you, an
d with a single tap or click, you can join or notify 
participants that you’re running late…. You don’t need to switch between applications to 
collaborate. Instantly go from a chat to a call, share your screen, and even invite more people, 
with a simple cli
ck or tap, all in the same application.”) 
27.
Amazon also uses the following logo form of its Infringing Trademarks: 

See 
https://chime.aws/. 
28.
The acts of Defendant in advertising, offering for sale, and selling in interstate 
commerce goods and services branded with the Infringing Trademarks are: (a) likely to cause 
confusion and mistake among the consuming public that such goods and services originate with 
Plaintiff, (b) likely to cause confusion and mistake among the consuming public that there is 
some affiliation, connection or association between Defendant and Plaintiff, and (c) likely to 
cause confusion and mistake among the consuming public that such goods and services are being 
offered to the consuming public with the sp
onsorship or approval of Plaintiff. 
29.
Not only is AWS’s infringing CHIME product and service likely to cause 
confusion, but there have already been multiple instances of confusion since AWS’s public 
launch of its product and service last week. As a result o
f AWS’s infringement, CafeX has Case 1:17-cv-01349-VM Document 1 Filed 02/22/17 Page 7 of 14
received numerous communications from confused third parties, including queries regarding 
whether Amazon’s product uses CafeX’s CHIME technology and annoyed business partners 
confused into believing incorrectly that CafeX chose to partner with AWS rather than with them 
to market and sell CafeX’s CHIME product and service. 
30.
AWS has signed up to be an exhibitor at the 2017 Enterprise Connect trade show 
where it is planning to promote its infringing CHIME product and service. 

31.
AWS’s booth at the 2017 Enterprise Connect show is only two booths away from 
where CafeX’s booth will be.

32.
Thus, in a matter of weeks, at the industry’s most significant trade show of the 
year, the same trade show where one year ago CafeX won Best of Enterprise Connect for its 
CHIME-branded technology and where thousands of potential customers and business partners 
will be in attendance, AWS will be promoting its competing and infringing CHIME-branded 
technology just 30 feet away from where CafeX will be promoting its CHIME-branded 
technology to the same potential customers and partners, causing great damage and irreparable 
harm to CafeX. 
33.
Furthermore, AWS is scheduled to give a keynote address at the 2017 Enterprise 
Connect show. AWS’s address will be livestreamed over the internet, allowing anyone in the 
world to watch it live. AWS is expected to promote its infringing CHIME technology via its 
keynote address, providing it with massive marketing coverage under the Infringing Trademarks. 
34.
Defendant’s willful infringement is likely to cause confusion and mistake among 
the consuming public as to the source, affiliation and/or sponsorship of Defendant’s goods and 
services, and will improperly and unfairly provide Defendant with the benefit of the goodwill 
associated with the CafeX CHIME™ Trademarks. Case 1:17-cv-01349-VM Document 1 Filed 02/22/17 Page 8 of 14
35. In addition, AWS is a far larger and more renown company than CafeX. AWS 
reportedly had over $12 billion in sales and $3 billion in profit in 2016. If AWS is permitted to 
use the Infringing Trademarks at the upcoming Enterprise Connect trade show and otherwise 
continue to market its products and services under the Infringing Trademarks, AWS will be able 
to saturate the market, overwhelming CafeX and its CHIME Trademarks. As a result, the public 
will come to assume 
incorrectly that CafeX’s CHIME-branded products and services are really 
AWS’s, or that CafeX’s CHIME-branded products and services are somehow connected to 
AWS. CafeX will thereby lose control over its goodwill and reputation, its identity, and the 
value 
of its CHIME Trademarks, to CafeX’s great and irreparable harm. FIRST CLAIM FOR RELIEF 
(FEDERAL FALSE DESIGNATION OF ORIGIN, FALSE ADVERTISING AND 
UNFAIR COMPETITION) 
36.
Plaintiff adopts, repeats and realleges each and every allegation previously set 
forth in paragraphs 1
-35 of this Complaint as if fully set forth in this paragraph. 
37.
Defendant’s use and continued use of the Infringing Trademarks in providing and 
advertising in commerce substantially similar goods and services is an infringement of Plaintiff’s 
exclusive rights and is likely to create confusion, or to cause mistake, or to deceive as to the 
origin, sponsorship or approval of Defendant’s goods and services by Plaintiff in violation of 15 
U.S.C. § 112
5(a). Plaintiff has been damaged as a result, in an amount to be determined at trial.

38.
Defendant’s activities complained of herein are in bad faith, with the intent to 
trade upon the goodwill and reputation established by Plaintiff, to create confusion in 
the public 
mind, and to misappropriate Plaintiff’s rights in said goodwill and reputation, all to the 
irreparable injury of Plaintiff, and has resulted in profits to Defendant.
Case 1:17-cv-01349-VM Document 1 Filed 02/22/17 Page 9 of 14
39. Pursuant to § 35 of the Lanham Act (15 U.S.C. § 1117), Defendant’s actions as 
set forth above permit recovery of Defendant’s profits, damages, and costs by Plaintiff, including 
treble damages and Plaintiff’s attorney’s fees. 
40.
Defendant’s activities complained of herein have caused and, unless restrained 
and enjoined, will continue to 
cause irreparable damage and injury to Plaintiff, for which 
Plaintiff has no adequate remedy at law. SECOND CLAIM FOR RELIEF 
(COMMON LAW TRADEMARK INFRINGEMENT AND UNFAIR COMPETITION) 
41.
Plaintiff adopts, repeats and realleges each and every allegation previously set 
forth in parag
raphs 1
-35 of this Complaint as if fully set forth in this paragraph. 
42.
The aforementioned acts of Defendant constitute trademark infringement and 
unfair competition in violation of the common law of the State of New York.

43.
Such conduct on the part of Defendant has allowed Defendant to wrongfully 
profit and has injured Plaintiff in an amount to be determined at trial and has caused and 
threatens to cause irreparable injury to Plaintiff, for which Plaintiff has no adequate remedy at 
law. 
THIRD CLAIM FOR RELIEF 
(N.Y. GENERAL BUSINESS LAW § 349) 
44.
Plaintiff adopts, repeats and realleges each and every allegation previously set 
forth in paragraphs 1
-35 of this Complaint as if fully set forth in this paragraph. 
45.
The aforementioned acts of Defendant constitute deceptive acts and practices and 
have caused and are expected to continue to cause consumer injury. These aforementioned acts 
of Defendant not only harm Plaintiff, but also harm the public interest, in violation of New York 
General Business Law § 349. Case 1:17-cv-01349-VM Document 1 Filed 02/22/17 Page 10 of 14
46. Such conduct on the part of Defendant has allowed Defendant to wrongfully 
profit and has injured Plaintiff in an amount to be determined at trial and has caused and 
threatens to cause irreparable injury to Plaintiff, for which Plaintiff has no adequate remedy at 
law. PRAYER FOR RELIEF 
WHEREFORE, Plaintiff prays that this Court enter judgment against Defendant and in 
favor of Plaintiff as follows: 
A. Finding that Defendant’s activities complained of herein are unlawful under 
Federal and New York law; 

B. Preliminarily and permanently enjoining and restraining Defendant, its 
respective subsidiaries, affiliates, divisions, officers, directors, principals, 
servants, employees, successors and assigns, and all those in active concert or 
participation with them, from:

(1) using, in any fashion, the Infringing Trademarks, the CHIME™ 
Trademarks, or any variations thereof or any trade name, trademark 
or service mark confusingly or deceptively similar to the 
CHIME™ 
Trademarks in connection with the promotion, advertising, 
solicitation, operation, conduct and exp
ansion of Defendant’s 
business; 
(2) engaging in any other activity constituting unfair competition and 
unfair or deceptive acts or practices with Plaintiff, or constituting an 
infringement of the CHIME™ Trademarks, or of Plaintiff’s rights 
in, or right to use 
or exploit such trademarks; Case 1:17-cv-01349-VM Document 1 Filed 02/22/17 Page 11 of 14
(3) making any statement or representation whatsoever, with respect to 
the infringing goods and services at issue, that falsely designates the 
origin of the services as those of Plaintiff, or that is false or 
misleading with respect

to Plaintiff; and 
(4) engaging in any other activity, including the effectuation of assignments or transfers of its interests in the Infringing 
Trademarks, or other infringements of the CHIME™ Trademarks, 
the formation of other corporations, partnerships, associations or 
other entities or the utilization of any other devices, for the purpose 
of circumventing, evading, avoiding or otherwise violating the 
prohibitions set forth in subsections B(1) through B(3) above. 
C. Ordering Defendant, its respective subsidiaries, affiliates, divisions, officers, 
directors, principals, servants, employees, successors and assigns, and all those 
in active concert or participation with them to deliver to Plaintiff for destruction, 
all advertisements, brochures, promotional materials, signs, stationery, business 
cards, other written material or audiovisual items, clothing, personal accessories, 
or any other product or thing which depicts or otherwise discloses the Infringing 
Trademarks, or any name or mark confusingly similar thereto
; 
D. Ordering Defendant, its respective subsidiaries, affiliates, divisions, officers, 
directors, principals, servants, employees, successors and assigns, and all those 
in active concert or participation with them, to prepare and distribute corrective 
advertising; Case 1:17-cv-01349-VM Document 1 Filed 02/22/17 Page 12 of 14
E. Directing such other relief as the Court may deem appropriate to prevent the 
trade and public from deriving any erroneous impression that any goods and 
services at issue in this case that have been offered for sale, sold or otherwise 
circulated or promoted by Defendant are authorized by Plaintiff, or are related to 
or associated in any way with Plaintiff or its goods and services.

F. Requiring Defendant to account and pay to Plaintiff all profits realized by 
Defendant’s wrongful acts and directing that 
such profits be enhanced because 
of, among other things, Defendant’s willful actions.

G. Awarding Plaintiff damages for the injuries sustained by Plaintiff and directing 
that such damages be trebled because of, among other things, Defendant’s 
willful actions. 
H. Awarding Plaintiff its costs and reasonable attorneys’ and investigatory fees, expenses, and costs, together with pre-judgment and post-judgment interest. 
I. Directing that this Court retain jurisdiction of this action for the purpose of enabling Plaintiff to apply to the Court at any time for such further orders and interpretation or execution of any order entered in this action, for the modification of any such order, for the enforcement or compliance therewith and for the punishment of any violations thereof. 
J. Awarding Plaintiff such other and further relief as the Court may deem just and proper. Case 1:17-cv-01349-VM Document 1 Filed 02/22/17 Page 13 of 14
JURY TRIAL DEMANDED 

Plaintiff demands a jury trial. 
Date: February 22, 2017 Respectfully submitted, 

By: /s/David Brafman 

David Brafman 
Mark D. Passler (pro hac vice to be filed) 
AKERMAN LLP 
777 S. Flagler Drive 
Suite 1100, West Tower 
West Palm Beach, FL 33401 
Tel: (561) 653
-5000 
Fax: (561) 659
-6313 
Email: [email protected] 

Ira S. Sacks 
AKERMAN LLP 
666 Fifth Avenue, 20th Floor 
New York, NY 10103 
Tel. (212) 880
-3800 
Fax (212) 880
-8965 
Email: [email protected] Case 1:17-cv-01349-VM Document 1 Filed 02/22/17 Page 14 of 14










CaféX Communications Company Profile: Valuation & Investors | PitchBookLog in Request a free trialRequest a free trial Log inProductsProductsLeading data software for VC, PE and M&A The PitchBook Platform PitchBook MobileProduct OverviewThe PitchBook PlatformPitchBook Mobile AppAPI & Data FeedCRM & Excel PluginsCommitment to ServiceCustomer SuccessCustomer TestimonialsSolutionsSolutionsHow our clients use the PitchBook platformInvestment BanksVenture CapitalPrivate EquityLimited PartnersCorporate DevelopmentLendersLaw FirmsAccounting FirmsLearn about our platform Watch video tutorialsDataDataPrivate company profiles See our data at workResearch Learn more about our processComprehensive data coverageCompaniesInvestorsDealsPeopleLPsFinancialsFundsMergers & AquisitionsAdvisorsNews & AnalysisNews & Analysis Industry News & Analysis Download our latest report Sign up for our newsletter Private Company ProfilesAboutAbout Our Story Press & Media Center Careers at PitchBookOur PartnersEvent CalendarAdvertise with usContact usCompany Profilesdriven by the PitchBook PlatformDIRECTORYCaféX Communicationswww.cafex.comDescriptionDeveloper of a real-time digital engagement platform. The company offers an online platform designed to enhance digital engagement services via video chats, co-browsing, on-screen drawings and instant file sharing to increase customer satisfaction and staff efficiency.2013FoundedPRIVATEStatus51-200EmployeesSeries CLatest Deal Type$18MLatest Deal Amount$49.6MTotal Amount RaisedDescriptionDeveloper of a real-time digital engagement platform. The company offers an online platform designed to enhance digital engagement services via video chats, co-browsing, on-screen drawings and instant file sharing to increase customer satisfaction and staff efficiency.Website:www.cafex.comFormerly Known AsTP Fusion Software Holding CompanyOwnership StatusPrivately Held (backing)Financing StatusVenture Capital-BackedPrimary IndustryBusiness/Productivity SoftwareOther IndustriesCommunication SoftwareSocial/Platform SoftwarePrimary Office521 Fifth Avenue Suite 822 New York, NY 10175United States +1 (646) 351-0511Request a free trial to the PitchBook PlatformYou're viewing a free company profile from the PitchBook Platform. To explore CaféX Communications's full profile, request a free trial.CaféX Communications Valuation and FundingRequest accessDeal TypeDateAmountRaised to DatePost-ValStatusStageTo view this company's complete deal history including valuation and funding, request access »CaféX Communications Cap TableStock# of SharesAuthorizedPar ValueDividend Rate (%)OriginalIssue PriceLiquidationLiquidationPref. MultipleConversionPrice% OwnedTo view this company's complete Cap Table, request access »CaféX Communications Investors (8)Request accessInvestor NameInvestor TypeHoldingInvestor SinceParticipating RoundsBoardSeatContactInfoCisco InvestmentsCorporate Venture CapitalMinority000 0000000 0000Cynthia PadnosAngel (individual)Minority000 0000000 0000Illuminate VenturesVenture CapitalMinority000 0000000 0000Individual InvestorAngel (individual)Minority000 0000000 0000Intel CapitalCorporate Venture CapitalMinority000 0000000 0000Cisco Investments Corporate Venture CapitalCynthia Padnos Angel (individual)Illuminate Ventures Venture CapitalIndividual Investor Angel (individual)Intel Capital Corporate Venture CapitalYou're viewing 5 of 8 investors. Get the full list »CaféX Communications Executive Team (12)NameTitleBoardSeatContactInfoRami MusallamChief Executive Officer, Co-Founder & Board MemberThomas O'FlahertyChief Financial Officer & Chief Administrative OfficerDaniel SolitoChief Operating Officer & Senior Vice PresidentKris HopkinsChief Strategy OfficerDavid JodoinChief Technology Officer & Co-FounderRami Musallam Chief Executive Officer, Co-Founder & Board MemberThomas O'Flaherty Chief Financial Officer & Chief Administrative OfficerDaniel Solito Chief Operating Officer & Senior Vice PresidentKris Hopkins Chief Strategy OfficerDavid Jodoin Chief Technology Officer & Co-FounderYou're viewing 5 of 12 executives. Get the full list »CaféX Communications Board Members (11)NameRepresentingRoleSinceContactInfoAleem RizvonSelfBoard Member000 0000Cliff HiggersonIlluminate VenturesAdvisor000 0000Cynthia PadnosIlluminate VenturesFounder & Managing Partner000 0000Gopi RanganSelfBoard Member000 0000Guy ChiarelloSelfBoard Member000 0000Aleem Rizvon Board Member SelfCliff Higgerson Advisor Illuminate VenturesCynthia Padnos Founder & Managing Partner Illuminate VenturesGopi Rangan Board Member SelfGuy Chiarello Board Member SelfYou're viewing 5 of 11 board members. Get the full list »Request full access to PitchBook homeproductsolutionsdataNews & AnalysisaboutcareerscontactFree trialPitchBook for...Investment banksVenture capital firmsPrivate equity firmsLimited partnersCorporate developmentLendersLaw firmsAccounting firmsOur dataCompaniesInvestorsDealsPeopleLPsFinancialsFundsM&AAdvisorsResourcesPitchBook-NVCA partnershipVideo libraryCustomer testimonialsPress inquiriesAdvertise with usGet startedCompany profile directoryRequest researchRequest your profileSubmit a dealSubscribe to News & Analysisfollow usUS Headquarters+1 (206) 623.1986901 Fifth AvenueSuite 1200Seattle, WA 98164EUROPE Headquarters+44 (0)207.190.98091 Oliver’s Yard55-71 City RoadLondon EC1Y 1HQUnited KingdomNEW YORK+1 (206) 623.1986155 Fifth AvenueSuite 500New York, NY 10010GENERAL INQUIRIESinfo@pitchbook.com© 2017 PitchBook Data. All rights reserved. Venture capital, private equity and M&A data and technology provider.Site MapTerms of UsePrivacy Policy










 


